District of Columbia statutes.
7-1231.10

Information privacy.

(a)

Consumers shall be informed of their right to access their mental health information records and may request correction of inaccurate information contained in the records in accordance with Chapter 12 of this title.

(b)

Information and records about a consumer’s mental health services and mental health supports shall be treated confidentially in accordance with Chapter 12 of this title.

Dec. 18, 2001, D.C. Law 14-56, § 210, 48 DCR 7674
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 210 of Mental Health Service Delivery Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-144, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 9947).